Missouri, session 2026, SB1099.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 1.487, to read as
follows:
1.487. 1. The general assembly declares that:
(1) The freedom and protection that follow from the
right to keep and bear arms as granted by Amendment II of
the Constitution of the United States are meaningless in a
society where the federal government ostensibly maintains
the power to determine which arms the people may or may not
bear;
(2) Any federal act, law, executive order, rule, or
regulation that restricts the type of arms that law abiding
citizens may bear is a transparent attempt to maintain
control of the people in violation of the sacred trust the
people have put into the federal government to act as agents
on their behalf; and
(3) The state of Missouri will not violate the
sovereignty of its own people by assisting, aiding, or in
any other way furthering the restriction of the rights

SB 1099 2
granted to them by their creator, as put down by the
founding fathers of this country.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, all federal acts, laws, executive orders,
administrative orders, rules, and regulations, regardless of
whether they were enacted before or after the provisions of
this section, that restrict the people's right to keep and
bear the following types of arms, as guaranteed by the
Second Amendment to the Constitution of the United States
and Article I, Section 23 of the Constitution of Missouri,
shall be invalid to this state, shall not be recognized by
this state, shall be specifically rejected by this state,
and shall not be enforced by this state:
(1) Any weapon which shoots, is designed to shoot, or
can be readily restored to shoot, automatically more than
one shot, without manual reloading, by a single function of
the trigger;
(2) The frame or receiver of any weapon described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection, or any part designed and
intended solely and exclusively, or combination of parts
designed and intended, for use in converting a weapon into a
weapon described in subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(3) Any combination of parts from which a weapon can
be assembled as described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection if such parts are in the possession or under the
control of a person; and
(4) Any other weapon or part that meets the definition
of "machinegun" as provided in 26 U.S.C. 5845(b).
3. It shall be the duty of the courts and law
enforcement agencies of this state to protect the rights of
law-abiding citizens to keep and bear arms within the

SB 1099 3
borders of this state and to protect these rights from the
infringements by the federal government.
✓